Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.140

Participating taxing districts.

Participating taxing districts must allow the use of all of their local property tax allocation revenues for local infrastructure project financing.

[ 2011 c 318 s 603.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.